District of Columbia statutes.
47-1809.06

Tax on estates and trusts — Beneficiary taxable year.

If the taxable year of a beneficiary is different from that of the estate or trust, the amount which he is required, under § 47-1809.05(1), to include in computing his net income, shall be based upon the income of the estate or trust for any taxable year of the estate or trust ending within his taxable year.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 348, ch. 258, art. I, title IX, § 6
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1809.6.
1973 Ed., § 47-1577e.